California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(D) A discount that is offered and funded by a winegrower on the purchase of wine sold directly by the winegrower to a consumer at or from the licensed premises of production or other licensed premises owned or leased and operated by the winegrower or through the Internet where a consumer buys directly from a winegrower.

(d) Nothing in this section is intended to preclude or prevent or otherwise restrict an on-sale or off-sale retail licensee that is not also a nonretail licensee from offering, funding, producing, sponsoring, promoting, furnishing, or redeeming a discount to consumers on the purchase of alcoholic beverages that
 is not otherwise prohibited by this section or any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 419, Sec. 2.   (AB 1722)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

25600.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a manufacturer of distilled spirits, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, out-of-state distilled spirits shipper’s certificate holder, winegrower, rectifier, or distiller, or its authorized unlicensed agent, may provide, free of charge, entertainment, food, and distilled spirits, wine, or nonalcoholic beverages to consumers at an invitation-only event in connection with the sale or distribution of wine or distilled spirits, subject to the following conditions:

(a) No licensee, other than those specified in this section, may conduct or participate in any portion of an event authorized by this section. A licensee authorized to conduct an event pursuant to
 this section shall not be precluded from doing so on the basis of holding any other type of alcoholic beverage license.

(b) An event authorized by this section shall be conducted on either the:

(1) Premises for which a caterer’s authorization has been issued, except that any event held on the premises of a licensed winegrower shall not be authorized to provide any distilled spirits other than brandy.

(2) Premises of a hotel holding an on-sale beer and wine or on-sale general license, except an event shall not be conducted in the lobby area of a hotel or in any portion of a hotel that is identified, promoted, or otherwise designated by the hotel as a club, nightclub, or other similar entertainment venue. For purposes
 of this paragraph, “hotel” means any hotel, motel, resort, bed and breakfast inn, or other similar transient lodging establishment, but it does not include any residential hotel as defined in Section 50519 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) A hotel where the event authorized by this section is being conducted shall maintain, during all times while exercising its license privileges, other areas within the licensed premises that shall be made readily available to the public not attending the authorized event.

(d) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), an event authorized by this section shall not be conducted on premises for which a permanent retail license has been issued.

(e) Except for
 fair market value payments authorized pursuant to this section, a retail licensee, including the licensed caterer or the licensed hotel, shall not receive, nor shall the licensee conducting the event give, any other item of value or benefit in connection with events authorized by this section.

(f) The person authorized by this section to provide, free of charge, entertainment, food, and beverages shall be present during the event.

(g) The person authorized by this section to provide, free of charge, entertainment, food, and beverages shall have sole responsibility for providing payment for the entertainment, food, beverages, and rental fees at the event. Payments for entertainment, food, beverages, and rental fees shall not exceed fair market value. No other licensed person
 shall be authorized, under this section, to provide any portion of these payments.

(h) Requests for attendance at the event shall be by invitation sent to consumers over 21 years of age at a specific address via mail or email, by telephone, or presented in person. Invitations or other advertisements of the event shall not be disseminated by any other means. Invitations shall not be sent by the authorized person or their authorized unlicensed agent inviting all of the employees of a retail licensee or a chain of retail licensees under common ownership to an authorized event.

(i) Attendance at the event shall be limited to consumers who receive and accept an invitation to the event. Invited consumers may each invite one guest. All attendees shall be over 21 years of age. The total
 number of consumers and their guests allowed at any event authorized by this section shall not exceed 600 people. Admittance to the event shall be controlled by a list containing the names of consumers who accepted the invitation and their guests. The persons identified in this section shall be responsible for compliance.

(j) No premium, gift, free goods, or other thing of value may be given away in connection with the event, except as authorized by this division.

(k) The duration of any event authorized by this section shall not exceed four hours.

(l) (1) Subject to paragraph (3), a person authorized to conduct events pursuant to this section shall not conduct more than 12 events in a
 calendar year where the consumers and guests in attendance exceed 100 people, and not more than 24 events in a calendar year where the consumers and guests in attendance is 100 people or fewer.

(2) The limitation on events authorized by this section shall be by person, whether that person holds a single license or multiple licenses. If a person holds multiple licenses, the limitation shall be applied to the person holding the license, not by type of license.

(3) A licensee authorized to conduct events pursuant to this section shall not conduct more than two events in a calendar year on the premises of any single licensed hotel or other licensed hotel under the same or common ownership.

(4) The licensee conducting the event
 shall not advertise any retail licensee. If the event is held on the premises of a retail licensee as permitted by this section, the licensee conducting the event may list the retailer’s name and address in the invitation and any related advertising for the sole purpose of identifying the location of the event. The listing of the retailer’s name and address shall be the only reference to the retail licensee and shall be relatively inconspicuous in relation to the invitation or advertisement as a whole. Pictures or illustrations of the retailer’s premises, or laudatory references to the retailer, shall not be permitted.

(5) (A) Other than as specifically authorized by this section, alcoholic beverage promotions of any sort shall not be conducted by any licensee in conjunction with an event held on the premises of a
 retail licensee pursuant to this section. This restriction includes any discounted drink specials offered by the retail licensee to consumers.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “in conjunction with” means during an event and any period within 24 hours before and 24 hours following an event.

(6) A retail licensee shall conspicuously offer for sale alcoholic beverages other than the products produced, distributed, bottled, or otherwise offered for sale by the licensee conducting the event.

(m) At least 30 days prior to an event, the licensee, or its authorized unlicensed agent, authorized to conduct the event shall apply to the department for a permit authorizing the event. In addition to any other information required by
 the department, the licensee shall provide the department all of the following information:

(1) The name of the company authorized to conduct the event.

(2) The number of people planned to be in attendance.

(3) The start and end times for the event.

(4) The location of the event.

(5) The name of the caterer, if required, obtaining the caterer’s authorization for the event.

(n) All alcoholic beverages provided pursuant to this section shall be purchased from the holder of the caterer’s permit or the licensed hotel, as applicable.

(o) All alcoholic beverages served at an event authorized by this section shall be served in accordance with Sections 25631 and 25632.

(p) No person authorized to conduct an event pursuant to this section shall hold such an event at the same location more than eight times in a calendar year.

(q) The person authorized to conduct an event under this section may provide attendees at the event with a free ride home. The free rides shall only constitute free ground transportation to attendees’ homes or to hotels or motels where attendees are staying.

(r) In addition to the prescribed fee imposed upon a licensed caterer to conduct an event authorized by this
 section, a fee of two hundred dollars ($200) shall be collected by the department from the licensee, or its authorized unlicensed agent, authorized by this section to provide, free of charge, entertainment, and beverages at an authorized event. This fee may be adjusted by the department pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 23320.

(s) All licensees involved in events held pursuant to this section shall be responsible for compliance with this section, and with all other provisions of this division in connection with these events, and each may be subject to discipline for violation of this division.

(t) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(1) That it is necessary and proper to require a separation between
 manufacturing interests, wholesale interests, and retail interests in the production and distribution of alcoholic beverages in order to prevent suppliers from dominating local markets through vertical integration and to prevent excessive sales of alcoholic beverages produced by overly aggressive marketing techniques.

(2) Any exception established by the Legislature to the general prohibition against tied interests must be limited to the express terms of the exception so as to not undermine the general prohibitions.

(u) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 296, Sec. 7.   (AB 2971)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

25601.

Every licensee, or agent or employee of a licensee, who keeps, permits to be used, or suffers to be used, in conjunction with a licensed premises, any disorderly house or place in which people abide or to which people resort, to the disturbance of the neighborhood, or in which people abide or to which people resort for purposes which are injurious to the public morals, health, convenience, or safety, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

25602.

(a) Every person who sells, furnishes, gives, or causes to be sold, furnished, or given away, any alcoholic beverage to any habitual or common drunkard or to any obviously intoxicated person is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) No person who sells, furnishes, gives, or causes to be sold, furnished, or given away, any alcoholic beverage pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section shall be civilly liable to any injured person or the estate of such person for injuries inflicted on that person as a result of intoxication by the consumer of such alcoholic beverage.

(c) The Legislature hereby declares that this section shall be interpreted so that the holdings in cases such as Vesely v. Sager (5 Cal. 3d 153), Bernhard v. Harrah’s Club (16 Cal. 3d 313) and Coulter v. Superior Court (____ Cal. 3d ____) be abrogated in favor of prior judicial interpretation finding the consumption of alcoholic beverages rather than the serving of alcoholic beverages as the proximate cause of injuries inflicted upon another by an intoxicated person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 929.)
-------------------------------------------

25602.1.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 25602, a cause of action may be brought by or on behalf of any person who has suffered injury or death against any person licensed, or required to be licensed, pursuant to Section 23300, or any person authorized by the federal government to sell alcoholic beverages on a military base or other federal enclave, who sells, furnishes, gives or causes to be sold, furnished or given away any alcoholic beverage, and any other person who sells, or causes to be sold, any alcoholic beverage, to any obviously intoxicated minor where the furnishing, sale or giving of that beverage to the minor is the proximate cause of the personal injury or death sustained by that person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 289, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

25602.2.

The director may bring an action to enjoin a violation or the threatened violation of subdivision (a) of Section 25602. Such action may be brought in the county in which the violation occurred or is threatened to occur. Any proceeding brought hereunder shall conform to the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that it shall be presumed that there is no adequate remedy at law, and that irreparable damage will occur if the continued or threatened violation is not restrained or enjoined.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 930.)
-------------------------------------------

25602.3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, no licensee may petition the department for an offer in compromise pursuant to Section 23095 for a second or any subsequent violation of subdivision (a) of Section 25602 which occurs within 36 months of the initial violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 930.)
-------------------------------------------

25603.

Every person, not authorized by law, who brings into any state prison, city or county jail, city and county jail, or reformatory in this State, or within the grounds belonging to any such institution, any alcoholic beverage is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

25604.

It is a public nuisance for any person to maintain any club room in which any alcoholic beverage is received or kept, or to which any alcoholic beverage is brought, for consumption on the premises by members of the public or of any club, corporation, or association, unless the person and premises are licensed under this division. It is a public nuisance for any person to keep, maintain, operate or lease any premises for the purpose of providing therein for a consideration a place for the drinking of alcoholic beverages by members of the public or other persons, unless the person and premises are licensed under this division. As used herein “consideration” includes cover charge, the sale of food, ice, mixers or other liquids used with alcoholic beverage drinks, or the furnishing of glassware or other containers for use in the consumption of alcoholic beverage drinks.

The Attorney General or any district attorney may bring an action in the name of the people to abate the nuisance, and the Attorney General shall, upon request of the department, bring the action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

25605.

No off-sale licensee shall deliver any alcoholic beverages pursuant to orders received for alcoholic beverages by telephone or other electronic means unless upon delivery the recipient shall be able to furnish proof of age and identity to indicate that he or she is 21 years of age or over.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 337, Sec. 5.   (SB 818)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

25606.

It is unlawful for any person to use any automobile or other vehicle to conceal, convey, carry, or transport any alcoholic beverages which are subject to seizure under this division, or any stills or parts thereof subject to seizure under this division, or any materials or supplies capable of and intended for use in the manufacture or production of alcoholic beverages with the design to evade the excise taxes or license fees imposed by this division. This section does not apply to any person who uses an automobile or other vehicle to transport distilled spirits for lawful use in the trades, professions, or industries. Any person violating the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

The department may seize any automobile or other vehicle used contrary to the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 59.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

25607.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f), it is unlawful for any person or licensee to have upon any premises for which a license has been issued any alcoholic beverages other than the alcoholic beverage that the licensee is authorized to sell at the premises under their license. It shall be presumed that all alcoholic beverages found or located upon premises for which licenses have been issued belong to the person or persons to whom the licenses were issued. Any person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor. The department may seize any alcoholic beverages found in violation of this section.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision
 (c), a bona fide public eating place for which an on-sale beer and wine license has been issued may have upon the premises brandy, rum, or liqueurs for use solely for cooking purposes.

(c) (1) A licensed winegrower, licensed beer manufacturer that holds a small beer manufacturer’s license, and a licensed craft distiller, in any combination, whose licensed premises of production are immediately adjacent to each other and that are not branch offices, may, with the approval of the department and under such conditions as the department may require, share a common licensed area in which the consumption of alcoholic beverages is permitted, only under all of the following circumstances:

(A) The shared common licensed area is adjacent and contiguous to the licensed
 premises of the licensees.

(B) The licensed premises of the licensees are not branch offices.

(C) The shared common licensed area shall be readily accessible from the premises of the licensees without the necessity of using a public street, alley, or sidewalk.

(D) Except as otherwise authorized by this division, the alcoholic beverages that may be consumed in the shared common licensed area shall be purchased by the consumer only from the licensed winegrower, the licensed beer manufacturer, or the licensed craft distiller.

(E) The licensed winegrower, the licensed beer manufacturer, and the licensed craft distiller shall be jointly responsible for compliance
 with the provisions of this division and for any violations that may occur within the shared common licensed area.

(2) Nothing in this subdivision is intended to authorize the licensed winegrower, the licensed beer manufacturer, or the licensed craft distiller to sell, furnish, give, or have upon their respective licensed premises any alcoholic beverages, or to engage in any other activity, not otherwise authorized by this division, including, without limitation, the consumption on the premises of any distilled spirits purchased by consumers for consumption off the premises pursuant to Section 23504 or the consumption of distilled spirits other than as permitted by Section 23363.1.

(d) The holder of a beer manufacturer’s license, winegrower’s license, brandy manufacturer’s license,
 distilled spirits manufacturer’s license, craft distiller’s license, any rectifier’s license, any importer’s license, or any wholesaler’s license, that holds more than one of those licenses for a single premises, may have alcoholic beverages that are authorized under those licenses at the same time anywhere within the premises for purposes of
 production and storage, if the holder of the licenses maintains records of production and storage that identify the specific location of each alcoholic beverage product within the premises. Nothing in this subdivision is intended to allow a licensee to hold licenses, alone or in combination, or to exercise any license privileges, not otherwise provided for or authorized by this division.

(e) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, a licensed manufacturer may share a common licensed area with multiple licensed retailers, subject to the provisions of this subdivision.

(1) No retail licensee sharing the common licensed area with a licensed manufacturer shall sell or serve any alcoholic beverages that are manufactured, produced, bottled, processed, imported, rectified,
 distributed, represented, or sold by the manufacturer, directly or indirectly. This prohibition shall apply to all licensed premises owned or operated, in whole or in part, by the retail licensee anywhere in the state. No wholesaler shall be responsible for compliance with this paragraph.

(2) The licensed manufacturer may, in connection with the operation of the shared common area only, advertise or promote the common licensed area, including, but not limited to, any advertising or promotion related to the licensed retailers sharing the common licensed area, provided that each retailer pays its pro rata share of the costs of that advertising or promotion. The cost attributed to each retailer’s pro rata share shall not be less than the current market price for that advertising or promotion.

(3) The licensed manufacturer may, in connection with the operation of the shared common area only, pay its pro rata share of the cost of the operation of the shared common area, including, but not limited to, the cost of renting, utilities, or any other operating costs for the area.

(4) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3), no other thing of value may be given or furnished by the manufacturer to the retailers.

(5) The manufacturer may have on the area of its licensed premises that encompass the shared common licensed area alcoholic beverages that would not otherwise be permitted on the manufacturer’s licensed premises. This provision does not authorize the possession of alcoholic beverages not otherwise permitted on the manufacturer’s licensed premises that
 is not part of the shared common licensed area.

(6) All retailers sharing the common licensed area shall hold the same license type. Nothing in this subdivision shall authorize any of the retailers to exercise license privileges that are not
 authorized by their license.

(7) All licensees holding licenses within the shared common licensed area shall be jointly responsible for compliance with all laws that may subject their license to discipline.

(8) A wholesaler does not directly or indirectly underwrite, share in, or contribute to any costs related to the common licensed area.

(9) The manufacturer maintains records necessary to establish its compliance with this section.

(10) (A) This subdivision does not authorize a licensed manufacturer to share a common licensed area with a single retailer or with multiple retailers under common ownership, in whole or in
 part.

(B) This subdivision is intended to be a narrow exception to the separation of manufacturers and retailers. This subdivision shall be narrowly construed.

(11) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(A) It is necessary and proper to require a separation between manufacturing interests, wholesale interests, and retail interests in the production and distribution of alcoholic beverages in order to prevent suppliers from dominating local markets through vertical integration and to prevent excessive sales of alcoholic beverages produced by overly aggressive marketing techniques.

(B) Any exception established by the Legislature to the general prohibition
 against tied interests must be limited to the express terms of the exception so as to not undermine the general prohibitions.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, the holder of a beer manufacturer’s license, a winegrower’s license, a craft distilled spirits manufacturer’s license, or a brandy manufacturer’s license that holds any combination of those licenses for a single premises may have alcoholic beverages that are authorized under those licenses at the same time anywhere within the premises and may maintain a designated area upon that premises where
 retail sales and consumption authorized under those licenses may occur.

(2) The privileges described in paragraph (1) may be exercised by the licensee only if all of the following apply:

(A) The licenses are held under identical ownership.

(B) (i) Subject to clause (ii), the manufacturer’s licenses for the single premises are either all master licenses or all branch offices, and not a combination of a master license and a branch office.

(ii) If one of the manufacturer’s licenses for the single premises is a craft distilled spirits manufacturer’s license, then the manufacturer’s licenses for the single premises shall all be master licenses
 and not a combination of a master license and a branch office.

(C) For overlapping branch offices, only alcoholic beverages produced by the licensee are sold.

(3) Nothing in this subdivision is intended to allow a licensee to hold licenses, alone or in combination, or to exercise any license privileges, not otherwise provided for or authorized by this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 176, Sec. 1.   (SB 269)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

25607.5.

A nonprofit corporation that is required to obtain a license to sell beer or wine under Section 23300 may receive and possess beer or wine donated to it if, at the time of receipt of the beer or wine, the nonprofit corporation has submitted an application with the department for a license to sell the donated beer or wine. Nothing in this section is intended to affect or otherwise limit the application of Section 25503.9.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 107, Sec. 3.   (AB 774)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

25608.

(a) Every person who possesses, consumes, sells, gives, or delivers to another person an alcoholic beverage in or on a public schoolhouse or the grounds of the schoolhouse, is guilty of a misdemeanor. This section does not, however, make it unlawful for a person to acquire, possess, or use an alcoholic beverage in or on a public schoolhouse, or on the grounds of the schoolhouse, if any of the following applies:

(1) The alcoholic beverage possessed, consumed, or sold, pursuant to a license obtained under this division, is wine or beer that is produced by a bonded winery or brewery owned or operated as part of an instructional program in viticulture and enology or brewing.

(2) The alcoholic beverage is acquired, possessed, or used in connection with a course of instruction given at the school and the person has been authorized to acquire, possess, or use it by the governing body or other administrative head of the school.

(3) The public schoolhouse is surplus school property and the grounds of the schoolhouse are leased to a lessee that is a general law city with a population of less than 50,000, or the public schoolhouse is surplus school property and the grounds of the schoolhouse are located in an unincorporated area and are leased to a lessee that is a civic organization, and the property is to be used for community center purposes and no public school education is to be conducted on the property by either the lessor or the lessee and the
 property is not being used by persons under the age of 21 years for recreational purposes at any time during which alcoholic beverages are being sold or consumed on the premises.

(4) The alcoholic beverages are acquired, possessed, or used during events at a college-owned or college-operated veterans stadium with a capacity of over 12,000 people, located in a county with a population of over 6,000,000 people. As used in this paragraph, “events” mean football games sponsored by a college, other than a public community college, or other events sponsored by noncollege groups.

(5) The alcoholic beverages are acquired, possessed, or used during events at a public community college stadium with a capacity of 19,000 or more people in the City of Bakersfield. As used in this paragraph,
 “events” means sporting events or concerts sponsored by a public community college or other events sponsored by noncollege groups.

(6) The alcoholic beverages are acquired, possessed, or used during an event not sponsored by any college at a performing arts facility built on property owned by a community college district and leased to a nonprofit organization that is a public benefit
 corporation formed under Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code. As used in this paragraph, “performing arts facility” means an auditorium with more than 300 permanent seats.

(7) The alcoholic beverage is wine for sacramental or other religious purposes and is used only during authorized religious services held on or before January 1, 1995.

(8) The alcoholic beverages are acquired, possessed, or used during an event at a community center owned by a community services district or a city and the event is not held at a time when students are attending a public school-sponsored activity at the center.

(9) The alcoholic beverage is wine that is acquired,
 possessed, or used during an event sponsored by a community college district or an organization operated for the benefit of the community college district where the college district maintains both an instructional program in viticulture on no less than five acres of land owned by the district and an instructional program in enology, which includes sales and marketing.

(10) The alcoholic beverage is acquired, possessed, or used at a professional minor league baseball game conducted at the stadium of a community college located in a county with a population of less than 250,000 inhabitants, and the baseball game is conducted pursuant to a contract between the community college district and a professional sports organization.

(11) The alcoholic beverages are acquired, possessed, or
 used during events at a college-owned or college-operated stadium or other facility. As used in this paragraph, “events” means fundraisers held to benefit a nonprofit corporation that has obtained a license pursuant to this division for the event. “Events” does not include football games or other athletic contests sponsored by any college or public community college. This paragraph does not apply to any public education facility in which any grade from kindergarten to grade 12, inclusive, is schooled.

(12) The alcoholic beverages are possessed, consumed, or sold, pursuant to a license, permit, or authorization obtained under this division, for an event held at an overnight retreat facility owned and operated by a county office of education or a school district at times when pupils are not on the grounds.

(13) The grounds of the public schoolhouse on which the alcoholic beverage is acquired, possessed, used, or consumed is property that has been developed and is used for residential facilities or housing that is offered for rent, lease, or sale exclusively to faculty or staff of a public school or community college.

(14) The grounds of a public schoolhouse on which the alcoholic beverage is acquired, possessed, used, or consumed is property of a community college that is leased, licensed, or otherwise provided for use as a water conservation demonstration garden and community passive recreation resource by a joint powers agency comprised of public agencies, including the community college, and the event at which the alcoholic beverage is acquired, possessed, used, or
 consumed is conducted pursuant to a written policy adopted by the governing body of the joint powers agency and no public funds are used for the purchase or provision of the alcoholic beverage.

(15) The alcoholic beverage is beer or wine acquired, possessed, used, sold, or consumed only in connection with a course of instruction, sponsored dinner, or meal demonstration given as part of a culinary arts program at a campus of a California community college and the person has been authorized to acquire, possess, use, sell, or consume the beer or wine by the governing body or
 other administrative head of the school.

(16) The alcoholic beverages are possessed, consumed, or sold, pursuant to a license or permit obtained under this division for special events held at the facilities of a public community college during the special event. As used in this paragraph, “special event” means events that are held with the permission of the governing board of the community college district that are festivals, shows, private parties, concerts, theatrical productions, and other events held on the premises of the public community college and for which the principal attendees are members of the general public or invited guests and not students of the public community college.

(17) The alcoholic beverages are acquired, possessed, or used during an event at a
 community college-owned facility in which any grade from kindergarten to grade 12, inclusive, is schooled, if the event is held at a time when students in any grades from kindergarten to grade 12, inclusive, are not present at the facility. As used in this paragraph, “events” include fundraisers held to benefit a nonprofit corporation that has obtained a license pursuant to this division for the event.

(18) The alcoholic beverages are acquired, possessed, used, or consumed pursuant to a license or permit obtained under this division for special events held at facilities owned and operated by an educational agency, a county office of education, superintendent of schools, school district, or community college district at a time when pupils are not on the grounds. As used in this paragraph, “facilities” include, but are not limited to, office complexes,
 conference centers, or retreat facilities.

(b) Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall, in addition to the penalty imposed for the misdemeanor, be barred from having or receiving any privilege of the use of public school property that is accorded by Article 2 (commencing with Section 82537) of Chapter 8 of Part 49 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 213, Sec. 1.   (AB 2094)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25608.5.

(a) On the portion of the Lower American River, as defined in Section 5841 of the Public Resources Code, from the Hazel Avenue Bridge to the Watt Avenue Bridge, a person in a nonmotorized vessel shall not possess a container with an alcoholic beverage, whether opened or closed, during the summer holiday periods that the Sacramento County Board of Supervisors prohibits the consumption or possession of an open alcoholic beverage container on the land portions along the river.

(b) For purposes of this section, “container” means bottle, can, or other receptacle.

(c) A violation of this section is punishable as an infraction pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 25132 of the Government Code.

(d) Sacramento County shall provide notice on the land portions along the river described in subdivision (a) that a violation of this section is punishable as an infraction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 19, Sec. 1.   Effective June 28, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

25608.10.

(a) On the portion of the Truckee River, from the outfall of Lake Tahoe upstream of the Highway 89 Bridge in Tahoe City to the Alpine Meadows Bridge, a person in a vessel, as defined by Section 651 of the Harbors and Navigation Code, or a bather, as defined by Section 651.1 of the Harbors and Navigation Code, shall not possess a container with an alcoholic beverage, whether opened or closed, during the summer holiday periods that the Placer County Board of Supervisors prohibits the consumption of an alcoholic beverage or possession of an open alcoholic beverage container on the land portions along this portion of the river.

(b) For purposes of this section, “container” means a bottle, can, or other receptacle.

(c) A violation of this section is punishable as an infraction pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 25132 of the Government Code.

(d) Placer County shall provide notice on the land portions along the Truckee River described in subdivision (a) that a violation of this section is punishable as an infraction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 44, Sec. 1.   Effective June 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

25608.12.

(a) On the portion of the Sacramento River, from the Highway 32 Bridge to the mouth of Big Chico Creek, a person in a vessel, as defined by Section 651 of the Harbors and Navigation Code, or a bather, as defined by Section 651.1 of the Harbors and Navigation Code, shall not possess a container with an alcoholic beverage, whether opened or closed, during the summer holiday periods that the Glenn County Board of Supervisors and the Butte County Board of Supervisors prohibit the consumption of an alcoholic beverage or possession of an open alcoholic beverage container on the land portions along this portion of the Sacramento River.

(b) For purposes of this section, “container” means a bottle, can, or
 other receptacle. 

(c) A violation of this section is punishable as an infraction pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 25132 of the Government Code. 

(d) Glenn County and Butte County shall provide notice on the land portions along the Sacramento River described in subdivision (a) that a violation of this section is punishable as an infraction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 158, Sec. 1.   (AB 494)   Effective August 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

25609.

Every person who, in response to an inquiry or request for any brand, type, or character of alcoholic beverages, sells or offers for sale under an on-sale license a different brand, type, or character without first informing the purchaser of the difference is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

25610.

(a) Any person who erases, removes, obliterates, destroys, or renders illegible in any manner any serial numbers, stamps, marks, brands, legends, or other information required by federal or state law to be attached or placed upon any packages or original cases containing alcoholic beverages, before the contents of such packages or cases have been entirely removed, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Any licensee who possesses any original unopened package or case containing alcoholic beverages on which or from which any serial number required by federal or state law to be attached or placed has been erased, removed, obliterated, destroyed, or rendered illegible in any manner, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 775.)
-------------------------------------------

25611.1.

(a) Any manufacturer, winegrower, manufacturer’s agent, rectifier, distiller, bottler, importer, or wholesaler, or any officer, director, or agent of any of these persons may furnish, give, lend, sell, or rent:
